Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.380

Exclusive franchises prohibited.

No exclusive franchise or privilege shall be granted for the use of any street, alley, highway, or public place or any part thereof.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.23.380. Prior: 1907 c 241 s 32; RRS s 9039.]